District of Columbia statutes.
1-622.14

Rules; eligibility.

(a)

In order to ensure proper implementation of the group life insurance under § 1-622.05 by October 1, 1987, the Mayor may issue temporary rules regarding the group life insurance that shall not be subject to Council review. These temporary rules shall remain in effect only until the proposed rules have been approved or been deemed approved by the Council in accordance with subsection (b) of this section.

(b)

The Mayor shall, pursuant to subchapter I of Chapter 5 of Title 2, issue proposed rules to implement the provisions of this subchapter. The proposed rules shall be submitted to the Council for a 45-day period of review, excluding Saturdays, Sundays, legal holidays, and days of Council recess. If the Council does not approve or disapprove the proposed rules, in whole or in part, by resolution within this 45-day review period, the proposed rules shall be deemed approved.

(c)

The proposed rules shall prescribe the time, manner, and conditions under which employees are eligible for coverage. The proposed rules may exclude employees on the basis of the nature and type of employment or conditions of employment such as short-term appointment, seasonal employment, intermittent or part-time employment, and employment of a similar nature, but shall not exclude an employee or group of employees solely on the basis of the hazardous nature of employment.

History

Mar. 3, 1979, D.C. Law 2-139, § 2214
as added Oct. 1, 1987, D.C. Law 7-27, § 2(f), 34 DCR 5079

Prior Codifications

1981 Ed., § 1-623.14.